Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NORTHWEST REGIONAL SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT FACILITY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation; bond proceeds. new text end new text begin (a) $34,588,148 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Pollution Control Agency for grants to nine counties to fund specified aspects of a regional waste management system that will include one new lined regional debris disposal facility located in Hubbard County and 12 mixed-use collection and processing facilities located in the counties of Beltrami, Cass, Clearwater, Hubbard, Mahnomen, Marshall, Norman, Polk, and Red Lake, that coordinate with the two regional debris disposal facilities. Of this appropriation: new text end new text begin (1) $5,439,285 is for a grant to Beltrami County to design and construct new buildings and site improvements at the existing solid waste processing facilities in Beltrami County and to acquire and install capital equipment; new text end new text begin (2) $5,689,725 is for a grant to Cass County to design and construct new buildings and make site improvements at the existing solid waste processing facility in Cass County, and to acquire and install capital equipment; new text end new text begin (3) $1,185,450 is for a grant to Clearwater County to design and construct a new building, renovate an existing building, and implement site improvements at the existing solid waste processing facility in Clearwater County and to acquire and install capital equipment; new text end new text begin (4) $6,894,375 is for a grant to Hubbard County to design and construct a lined regional construction and demolition debris landfill facility that includes construction of new buildings and site improvements and acquisition and installation of capital equipment for processing solid waste; new text end new text begin (5) $8,463,563 is for a grant to Hubbard County to design and construct the expansion of and renovations to buildings to construct new buildings, make site improvements at the existing solid waste processing facilities in Hubbard County, and to acquire and install capital equipment; new text end new text begin (6) $690,000 is for a grant to Mahnomen County to design and construct new buildings, make site improvements, and to acquire and install capital equipment; new text end new text begin (7) $968,250 is for a grant to Marshall County to design and construct a new building, site improvements, and to acquire and install capital equipment; new text end new text begin (8) $352,500 is for a grant to Norman County to design and construct a new building, make site improvements, and to acquire and install capital equipment; new text end new text begin (9) $4,492,500 is for a grant to Polk County to design and construct expansion of and renovations to buildings, to construct new buildings, make site improvements at the existing solid waste processing facilities in Polk County, and to acquire and install capital equipment; and new text end new text begin (10) $412,500 is for a grant to Red Lake County to design and construct new buildings, site improvements, and to acquire and install capital equipment. new text end new text begin (b) "Capital equipment" as used in this subdivision means fixed equipment with a useful life of at least ten years that is used to manage, alter, classify, sort, or process solid waste, including conveyor systems, balers, compactors, compressors, robots to manipulate waste, fire suppression systems, and scales. new text end new text begin (c) "Site improvements" as used in this subdivision means infrastructure necessary to access, secure, use, or operate a solid waste processing facility. new text end new text begin (d) "Building" as used in this subdivision means a building used primarily for reducing exposure of materials contained within to the elements, to allow for aggregation, processing or storage of those materials, and for ancillary purposes to support those activities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $34,588,148 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GENERAL FUND.new text end new text begin (a) $15,718,103 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the Pollution Control Agency for grants to nine counties for heavy equipment, containers, or trailers for spoke facilities for a nine-county regional waste management system as follows: new text end new text begin (1) $1,385,715 is for a grant to Beltrami County to acquire heavy equipment and containers for the spoke located in Beltrami County, and material hauling trucks and trailers to expand the current multicounty hauling services; new text end new text begin (2) $1,060,275 is for a grant to Cass County to acquire material-hauling trucks, heavy equipment, mobile processing equipment, and containers for the spoke located in Cass County; new text end new text begin (3) $614,550 is for a grant to Clearwater County to acquire heavy equipment and containers for the spoke located in Clearwater County; new text end new text begin (4) $2,855,625 is for a grant to Hubbard County to purchase material-hauling trucks, heavy equipment, mobile processing equipment, and containers to move and manage materials at the new lined regional debris disposal facility in Hubbard County; new text end new text begin (5) $1,886,438 is for a grant to Hubbard County to purchase heavy equipment, mobile processing equipment, and containers for the spoke located in Hubbard County and trailers to expand the current multicounty hauling services; new text end new text begin (6) $210,000 is for a grant to Mahnomen County to purchase heavy equipment and containers for the spoke located in Mahnomen County; new text end new text begin (7) $531,750 is for a grant to Marshall County to purchase heavy equipment and containers for the spoke located in Marshall County; new text end new text begin (8) $135,000 is for a grant to Norman County to purchase heavy equipment and containers for the spoke located in Norman County; new text end new text begin (9) $6,513,750 is for a grant to Polk County to purchase heavy equipment, mobile processing equipment, and containers for the spokes located in Polk County and for trailers to expand the current multicounty hauling services; and new text end new text begin (10) $525,000 is for a grant to Red Lake County to purchase heavy equipment and containers for the spoke located in Red Lake County. new text end new text begin (b) Appropriations in this section are onetime and are available until encumbered or expended, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin (c) As used in this section, "spoke" means a mixed-use collection and processing facility. new text end new text begin (d) As used in this section, "heavy equipment" means machinery that is self-propelled and used primarily for moving, sorting, altering material size or shape, or aggregating materials. new text end